New Jersey, session 221, S1632.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 41 of P.L.2012, c.45 (C.18A:64M-9) is amended to read as follows: 41.  The board of trustees of Rowan University shall have the general supervision over and be vested with the conduct of the university. It shall have the power and duty, subject to the approval of the Rowan University-Rutgers Camden Board of Governors which shall be subject to the limitations set forth in section 34 of P.L.2012, c.45 (C.18A:64M-38), to: a.     Adopt and use a corporate seal; b.    Determine the educational curriculum and program of the university; c.     Determine policies for the organization, administration, and development of the university; d.    Study the educational and financial needs of the university, annually acquaint the Governor and Legislature with the condition of the university, and prepare and submit an annual request for appropriation to the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury in accordance with law; e.     Disburse all moneys appropriated to the university by the Legislature and all moneys received from tuition, fees, auxiliary services and other sources; f.     Direct and control expenditures and transfers of funds appropriated to the university in accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, and, as to funds received from other sources, direct and control expenditures and transfers in accordance with the terms of any applicable trusts, gifts, bequests, or other special provisions, reporting changes and additions thereto and transfers thereof to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury. All accounts of the university shall be subject to audit by the State at any time; g.    In accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, appoint and fix the compensation and term of office of a president of the university who shall be the executive officer of the university and an ex officio member of the board of trustees, without vote, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board of trustees; h.    In accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, appoint, upon nomination of the president, such deans and other members of the academic, administrative, and teaching staffs as shall be required and fix their compensation and terms of employment; i.     Consistent with the provisions of its budget, this act and any and all controlling collective bargaining agreements, have the power, upon nomination or recommendation of the president, to appoint, remove, promote and transfer all other officers, agents, or employees which may be required to carry out the provisions of this act and prescribe qualifications for those positions, and assign requisite duties and determine and fix respective compensation for those positions in accordance with duly adopted salary program parameters; j.     Grant diplomas, certificates or degrees; k.    Enter into contracts and agreements with the State or any of its political subdivisions or with the United States, or with any public body, department or other agency of the State or the United States or with any individual, firm or corporation which are deemed necessary or advisable by the board for carrying out the provisions of this act. A contract or agreement pursuant to this subsection may require a municipality to undertake obligations and duties to be performed subsequent to the expiration of the term of office of the elected governing body of such municipality which initially entered into or approved said contract or agreement, and the obligations and duties so incurred by such municipality shall be binding and of full force and effect, notwithstanding that the term of office of the elected governing body of such municipality which initially entered into or approved said contract or agreement, shall have expired; l.     Exercise the right of eminent domain, pursuant to the provisions of the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), to acquire any property or interest therein; m.   Adopt, after consultation with the president and faculty, bylaws and make and promulgate such rules, regulations, and orders, not inconsistent with the provisions of this act as are necessary and proper for the administration and operation of the university and the carrying out of its purposes; n.    Establish fees for room and board sufficient for the operation, maintenance, and rental of student housing and food services facilities; o.    Fix and determine tuition rates and other fees to be paid by students; p.    Accept from any government or governmental department, agency or other public or private body or from any other source grants or contributions of money or property which the board may use for or in aid of any of its purposes; q.    Acquire, by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, own, lease, dispose of, use and operate property, whether real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, which is necessary or desirable for university purposes; r.     Employ architects to plan buildings; secure bids for the construction of buildings and for the equipment thereof; make contracts for the construction of buildings and for equipment; and supervise the construction of buildings; s.     Manage and maintain, and provide for the payment of all charges on and expenses in respect of, all properties utilized by the university; t.     Borrow money and to secure the same by a mortgage on its property or any part thereof, and to enter into any credit agreement for the needs of the university and projects of the Rowan University-Rutgers Camden Board of Governors, as deemed requisite by the board, in such amounts and for such time and upon such terms as may be determined by the board, provided that no such borrowing shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds, other than moneys appropriated for that purpose, of the State; u.    Authorize any new program, educational department or school consistent with the programmatic mission of the institution or approved by the Secretary of Higher Education; v.  (1)  Adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all equipment, materials, supplies and services; however, no contract on behalf of the university shall be entered into for the purchase of services, materials, equipment and supplies, for the performance of any work, or for the hiring of equipment or vehicles, through which workers employed in the performance of the contract are paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.), where the sum to be expended exceeds $30,700 or the amount determined by the Governor as provided herein, unless the university shall first publicly advertise for bids and shall award the contract to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered. Such advertising shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any such products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the said board. (2)  Adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all equipment, materials, supplies and services; however, no contract on behalf of the university shall be entered into for the purchase of services, materials, equipment and supplies, for the performance of any work, or for the hiring of equipment or vehicles, through which workers employed in the performance of the contract are not paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.), where the sum to be expended exceeds $100,000 or the amount determined by the Governor as provided in this subsection, unless the university shall first publicly advertise for bids and shall award the contract to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered. This advertising shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the board. (3)   Commencing July 1, 2013 and every two years thereafter, the Governor, in consultation with the Department of the Treasury, shall adjust the threshold [amount] amounts set forth in this [paragraph] subsection in direct proportion to the rise or fall of the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the New York City and the Philadelphia areas as reported by the United States Department of Labor. The Governor shall notify the university of the adjustment. The adjustment shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which it is reported. (4)   This subsection shall not prevent the university from having any work performed by its own employees, nor shall it apply to repairs, or to the furnishing of materials, supplies or labor, or the hiring of equipment or vehicles, when the safety or protection of its or other public property or the public convenience requires or the exigency of the university's service will not admit of such advertisement. In such case, the university shall, by resolution passed by the affirmative vote of its board of trustees, declare the exigency or emergency to exist, and set forth in the resolution the nature and approximate amount to be expended; shall maintain appropriate records as to the reason for such awards; and shall report regularly to its board of trustees on all such purchases, the amounts and the reasons therefor; w.   Invest certain moneys in such obligations, securities and other investments as the board shall deem prudent, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this act and in accordance with State and federal law, as follows: Investment in not-for-profit corporations or for-profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to the provisions of subsection x. of this section may utilize income realized from the sale or licensing of intellectual property as well as the reinvestment of earnings on intellectual property. Investment in not-for-profit corporations may also utilize income from the operation of faculty practice plans of the university and income from overhead grant fund recovery as permitted by federal law as well as other university funds except those specified in paragraph 5 of subsection x. of this section; x. (1) Participate as the general partner or as a limited partner, either directly or through a subsidiary corporation created by the university, in limited partnerships, general partnerships, or joint ventures engaged in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, scientific information or health care services and create or form for-profit or not-for-profit corporations to engage in such activities; provided that any such participation shall be consistent with the mission of the university and the board shall have determined that such participation is prudent; (2)   The decision to participate in any activity described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, including the creation or formation of for-profit or not-for-profit corporations, shall be articulated in the minutes of the board of trustees meeting in which the action was approved; (3)   The provisions of P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.) shall continue to apply to the university, its employees, and officers; (4)   Nothing herein shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds of the State; (5)   Funds directly appropriated to the university from the State or derived from the university's academic programs or derived from payment for coverage provided by the self insurance fund for claims accruing prior to the effective date of this act shall not be utilized by the for-profit or not-for-profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to this subsection in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology or scientific information; (6)   Employees of any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed public employees; (7)   A joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed an instrumentality of the State of New Jersey; (8)   Income realized by the university as a result of participation in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, or scientific information may be invested or reinvested pursuant to subsection w. of this section or any other provision of this act or State or federal law or retained by the board for use in furtherance of any of the purposes of this act or of other applicable statutes; (9)   The board shall annually report to the State Treasurer on the operation of all joint ventures, subsidiary corporations, partnerships, or such other jural entities entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university; y.    Sue and be sued in its own name; z.     Retain independent counsel including representation by the Attorney General in accordance with subsection h. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6); aa. (1) Procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance and indemnify against loss or damage to property from any cause, including loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employees' liability, against any act of any member, officer, employee or servant of the university, whether part-time, full-time, compensated or non-compensated in the performance of the duties of his office or employment or any other insurable risk. In addition, the university shall carry its own liability insurance or maintain an actuarially sound program of self insurance. Any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, or partnership or such other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall carry insurance or maintain reserves in such amounts as are determined by an actuary to be sufficient to meet its actual or accrued claims; (2)   Moneys in the fund known as the Self-Insurance Trust Fund administered by the State Treasurer shall continue to be available to the university solely to indemnify and defend claims against the university and its employees, officers and servants but only to the extent that the university has elected on behalf of itself and its employees to obtain representation from the Attorney General pursuant to subsection h. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6) and such entity or individuals would have been entitled to defense and indemnification pursuant to the "New Jersey Tort Claims Act," N.J.S.59:1-1 et seq., as a State entity or State employee but for the provision of subsection z. of this section. Any expenditure of such funds shall be made only in accordance with the provisions of the "New Jersey Tort Claims Act," N.J.S.59:1-1 et seq., including but not limited to the provisions of chapters 10, 10A and 11 of Title 59 of the New Jersey Statutes. Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize the use of the Self-Insurance Trust Fund to indemnify or insure in any way, directly or indirectly the activities of any joint venture, partnership or corporation entered into or created by the university pursuant to subsection x. of this section; bb.  Create auxiliary organizations subject to the provisions of P.L.1982, c.16 (C.18A:64-26 et seq.); cc.   Adopt a code of ethics that complies with the requirements of all statutes applicable to the institution, including, but not limited, to the "Higher Education Restructuring Act of 1994," P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-1 et al.), the "New Jersey Conflicts of Interest Law," P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.), regulations of the State Ethics Commission, and any applicable executive orders; and dd.  Establish a procedure for the confidential, anonymous submission of employee concerns regarding alleged wrongdoing at the university. (cf: P.L.2013, c.227, s.2) 2.    Section 9 of P.L.2017, c.178 (C.18A:64N-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.    The board of trustees of Montclair State University shall have the general supervision over and be vested with the conduct of the university.  It shall have the power and duty to: a.     Adopt, use, and modify, as it deems appropriate, its corporate seal; b.    Determine the educational curriculum and program of the university, including approving the establishment of new educational programs, departments, or schools, and the discontinuance of existing educational programs, departments, or schools at the university, provided that the action is consistent with the university's programmatic mission and that the action is reviewed by the New Jersey President's Council pursuant to subsection c. of section 8 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-8) or approved by the Secretary of Higher Education pursuant to subsection f. of section 14 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-14), as applicable; c.     Determine policies for the organization, administration, and development of the university; d.    Study the educational and financial needs of the university, annually acquaint the Governor and Legislature with the condition of the university, and prepare and submit an annual request for appropriation to the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury in accordance with law; e.     Disburse all moneys appropriated to the university by the Legislature and all moneys received from tuition, fees, auxiliary services and other sources; f.     Direct and control expenditures and transfers of funds appropriated to the university in accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, and, as to funds received from other sources, direct and control expenditures and transfers in accordance with the terms of any applicable trusts, gifts, bequests, or other special provisions, reporting changes and additions thereto and transfers thereof to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  All accounts of the university shall be subject to audit by the State at any time; g.    In accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, appoint and fix the compensation and term of office of a president of the university who shall be the executive officer of the university and an ex officio member of the board of trustees, without vote, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board of trustees; h.    In accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, appoint, upon nomination of the president, such deans and other members of the academic, administrative, and teaching staffs as shall be required and fix their compensation and terms of employment; i.     Consistent with the provisions of its budget, this act and any and all controlling collective bargaining agreements, have the power, upon nomination or recommendation of the president, to appoint, remove, promote and transfer all other officers, agents, or employees which may be required to carry out the provisions of this act and prescribe qualifications for those positions, and assign requisite duties and determine and fix respective compensation for those positions in accordance with duly adopted salary program parameters; j.     Grant diplomas, certificates or degrees; k.    Enter into contracts and agreements with the State or any of its political subdivisions or with the United States, or with any public body, department or other agency of the State or the United States, including any public institution of higher education in the State or their subsidiaries or affiliates, or with any individual, firm or corporation which are deemed necessary or advisable by the board for carrying out the provisions of this act.  A contract or agreement pursuant to this subsection may require a municipality to undertake obligations and duties to be performed subsequent to the expiration of the term of office of the elected governing body of such municipality which initially entered into or approved said contract or agreement, and the obligations and duties so incurred by such municipality shall be binding and of full force and effect, notwithstanding that the term of office of the elected governing body of such municipality which initially entered into or approved said contract or agreement, shall have expired; l.     Exercise the right of eminent domain, pursuant to the provisions of the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), to acquire any property or interest therein; m.   Adopt, after consultation with the president and faculty, bylaws and make and promulgate such rules, regulations, and orders, not inconsistent with the provisions of this act as are necessary and proper for the administration and operation of the university and the carrying out of its purposes; n.    Establish fees for room and board sufficient for the operation, maintenance, and rental of student housing and food services facilities; o.    Fix and determine tuition rates and other fees to be paid by students; p.    Accept from any government or governmental department, agency or other public or private body or from any other source grants or contributions of money or property which the board may use for or in aid of any of its purposes; q.    Acquire, by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, own, lease, dispose of, use and operate property, whether real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, which is necessary or desirable for university purposes; r.     Employ architects to plan buildings; secure bids for the construction of buildings and for the equipment thereof; make contracts for the construction of buildings and for equipment; and supervise the construction of buildings; s.     Manage and maintain, and provide for the payment of all charges on and expenses in respect of, all properties utilized by the university; t.     Borrow money and to secure the same by a mortgage on its property or any part thereof, and to enter into any credit agreement for the needs of the university, as deemed requisite by the board, in such amounts and for such time and upon such terms as may be determined by the board, provided that no such borrowing shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds, other than moneys appropriated for that purpose, of the State; u.    Authorize any other new program, educational department or school; v.    (1)  Adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all equipment, materials, supplies and services; however, no contract on behalf of the university shall be entered into for the purchase of services, materials, equipment and supplies, for the performance of any work, or for the hiring of equipment or vehicles, through which the workers employed in the performance of the contract are paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.), where the sum to be expended exceeds $33,000 or the amount determined by the Governor as provided herein, unless the university shall first publicly advertise for bids and shall award the contract to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered.  Such advertising shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any such products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the said board. (2)  Adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all equipment, materials, supplies and services; however, no contract on behalf of the university shall be entered into for the purchase of services, materials, equipment, and supplies, for the performance of any work, or for the hiring of equipment or vehicles, through which the workers employed in the performance of the contract are not paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.), where the sum to be expended exceeds $100,000 or the amount determined by the Governor as provided in this subsection, unless the university shall first publicly advertise for bids and shall award the contract to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered. This advertising shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the board. (3)   Commencing July 1, 2017 and every two years thereafter, the Governor, in consultation with the Department of the Treasury, shall adjust the threshold [amount] amounts set forth in this [paragraph] subsection in direct proportion to the rise or fall of the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the New York City and the Philadelphia areas as reported by the United States Department of Labor.  The Governor shall notify the university of the adjustment.  The adjustment shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which it is reported. (4)   This subsection shall not prevent the university from having any work performed by its own employees, nor shall it apply to repairs, or to the furnishing of materials, supplies or labor, or the hiring of equipment or vehicles, when the safety or protection of its or other public property or the public convenience requires or the exigency of the university's service will not admit of such advertisement.  In such case, the university shall, by resolution passed by the affirmative vote of its board of trustees, declare the exigency or emergency to exist, and set forth in the resolution the nature and approximate amount to be expended; shall maintain appropriate records as to the reason for such awards; and shall report regularly to its board of trustees on all such purchases, the amounts and the reasons therefor; w.   Invest certain moneys in such obligations, securities and other investments as the board shall deem prudent, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this act and in accordance with State and federal law, as follows: Investment in nonprofit corporations or for-profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to the provisions of subsection x. of this section may utilize income realized from the sale or licensing of intellectual property as well as the reinvestment of earnings on intellectual property.  Investment in nonprofit corporations may also utilize income from overhead grant fund recovery as permitted by federal law as well as other university funds except those specified in paragraph 5 of subsection x. of this section; x. (1) Participate as the general partner or as a limited partner, either directly or through a subsidiary corporation created by the university, in limited partnerships, general partnerships, or joint ventures to support such purposes including, but not limited to, those engaged in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, scientific information or services and create or form for-profit or nonprofit corporations to engage in such activities; provided that: (a) any such participation shall be consistent with the mission of the university; (b) the board shall have determined that such participation is prudent; and (c) unit work performed by employees of the university represented by one of the existing executive branch Statewide collective negotiations units is not transferred to the subsidiary corporation, limited partnership, general partnership, or joint venture created pursuant to this subsection or to persons employed by such subsidiary corporation, limited partnership, general partnership, or joint venture; (2) The decision to participate in any activity described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, including the creation or formation of for-profit or nonprofit corporations, shall be articulated in the minutes of the board of trustees meeting in which the action was approved; (3) The provisions of P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.) shall continue to apply to the university, its employees, and officers; (4) Nothing herein shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds of the State; (5) Funds directly appropriated to the university from the State or derived from the university's academic programs shall not be utilized by the for-profit or nonprofit corporations organized and operated pursuant to this subsection in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology or scientific information; (6) Employees of any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity formed, entered into, or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed public employees, however, any public employees of the university who may be assigned to support any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity formed, entered into, or owned wholly or in part by the university shall continue to be deemed public employees; (7) A joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed an instrumentality of the State of New Jersey; (8) Income realized by the university pursuant to this subsection may be invested, reinvested, or retained by the board in accordance with the provisions of this act or State or federal law for use in furtherance of any of the purposes of this act or of other applicable statutes; (9) The board shall annually report to the State Treasurer on the operation of all joint ventures, subsidiary corporations, partnerships, or such other jural entities entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university; and (10) This subsection shall apply if a joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university, is expressly formed, created, or owned by the university pursuant to the authority set forth in this subsection.  Further, this subsection shall in no way be construed to prohibit or limit the university from separately pursuing any other activities permitted by the authority granted under this act, or separately utilizing any other powers expressly authorized by this act for any activity consistent with the university's institutional mission, including to participate as the general partner or as a limited partner, either directly or through a subsidiary corporation created by the university, in limited partnerships, general partnerships, or joint ventures, otherwise than pursuant to this subsection; y.    Sue and be sued in its own name; z.     Retain independent counsel including representation by the Attorney General in accordance with subsection h. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6) and, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the university elects not to be represented by the Attorney General in any matter in which the university is solely responsible for any potential liability, it shall be permitted to do so upon notice to the Attorney General; aa. (1) Procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance and indemnify and defend against loss or damage to property from any cause, including loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employees' liability, against any act of any member, officer, employee or servant of the university, whether part-time, full-time, compensated or non-compensated in the performance of the duties of his office or employment or any other insurable risk.  In addition, the university shall carry its own liability insurance or maintain an actuarially sound program of self-insurance.  Any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, or partnership or such other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall carry insurance or maintain reserves in such amounts as are determined by an actuary to be sufficient to meet its actual or accrued claims; (2) Moneys in the fund known as the Self-Insurance Trust Fund administered by the State Treasurer shall continue to be available to the university solely to indemnify and defend claims against the university and its employees, officers and servants but only to the extent that the university has elected on behalf of itself and its employees to obtain representation from the Attorney General pursuant to subsection h. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6) and such entity or individuals would have been entitled to defense and indemnification pursuant to the "New Jersey Tort Claims Act," N.J.S.59:1-1 et seq., as a State entity or State employee but for the provision of subsection z. of this section.  Any expenditure of such funds shall be made only in accordance with the provisions of the "New Jersey Tort Claims Act," N.J.S.59:1-1 et seq., including but not limited to the provisions of chapters 10, 10A and 11 of Title 59 of the New Jersey Statutes.  Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize the use of the Self-Insurance Trust Fund to indemnify or insure in any way, directly or indirectly the activities of any joint venture, partnership or corporation entered into or created by the university pursuant to subsection x. of this section; bb.  Create auxiliary organizations subject to the provisions of P.L.1982, c.16 (C.18A:64-26 et seq.); cc.   Adopt a code of ethics that complies with the requirements of all statutes applicable to the institution, including, but not limited, to the "Higher Education Restructuring Act of 1994," P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-1 et al.), the "New Jersey Conflicts of Interest Law," P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.), regulations of the State Ethics Commission, and any applicable executive orders; dd.  Establish a procedure for the confidential, anonymous submission of employee concerns regarding alleged wrongdoing at the university; and ee.   Merge or consolidate, including through or with subsidiary corporations created by the university, with one or more other nonprofit corporations formed and operated primarily for educational purposes and exempt under paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of section 501 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. s.501(c)(3)), as the board of trustees may determine, but consistent with the public purposes of the corporation, and shall assume any vested rights, grants, charter rights, privileges, exemptions, immunities, powers, prerogatives, franchises or advantages, debts, or liabilities of the nonprofit corporation. A merger or consolidation with a subsidiary corporation created by the university pursuant to this subsection occurring after the effective date of P.L.2023, c.65 (C.18A:64N-9.1 et al.) shall not require approval of the Office of the Attorney General. (cf: P.L.2023, c.65, s.16) 3.    Section 9 of P.L.2021, c.282 (C.18A:64O-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.    The board of trustees of the university shall have the general supervision over and be vested with the conduct of the university.  It shall have the power and duty to: a.     adopt and use a corporate seal; b.    determine the educational curriculum and program of the university; c.     determine policies for the organization, administration, and development of the university; d.    study the educational and financial needs of the university, annually acquaint the Governor and Legislature with the condition of the university, and prepare and submit an annual request for appropriation to the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury in accordance with law; e.     disburse all moneys appropriated to the university by the Legislature and all moneys received from tuition, fees, auxiliary services and other sources; f.     direct and control expenditures and transfers of funds appropriated to the university in accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, and, as to funds received from other sources, direct and control expenditures and transfers in accordance with the terms of any applicable trusts, gifts, bequests, or other special provisions, reporting changes and additions thereto and transfers thereof to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury. All accounts of the university shall be subject to audit by the State at any time; g.    in accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, appoint and fix the compensation and term of office of a president of the university who shall be the executive officer of the university and an ex officio member of the board of trustees, without vote, and shall serve at the pleasure of the board of trustees; h.    in accordance with the provisions of the State budget and appropriation acts of the Legislature, appoint, upon nomination of the president, such deans and other members of the academic, administrative, and teaching staffs as shall be required and fix their compensation and terms of employment; i.     consistent with the provisions of its budget, this act and any and all controlling collective bargaining agreements, have the power, upon nomination or recommendation of the president, to appoint, remove, promote and transfer all other officers, agents, or employees which may be required to carry out the provisions of this act and prescribe qualifications for those positions, and assign requisite duties and determine and fix respective compensation for those positions in accordance with duly adopted salary program parameters; j.     grant diplomas, certificates or degrees; k.    enter into contracts and agreements with the State or any of its political subdivisions or with the United States, or with any public body, department or other agency of the State or the United States or with any individual, firm or corporation which are deemed necessary or advisable by the board for carrying out the provisions of this act.  A contract or agreement pursuant to this subsection may require a municipality to undertake obligations and duties to be performed subsequent to the expiration of the term of office of the elected governing body of such municipality which initially entered into or approved said contract or agreement, and the obligations and duties so incurred by such municipality shall be binding and of full force and effect, notwithstanding that the term of office of the elected governing body of such municipality which initially entered into or approved said contract or agreement, shall have expired; l.     exercise the right of eminent domain, pursuant to the provisions of the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), to acquire any property or interest therein; m.   adopt, after consultation with the president and faculty, bylaws and make and promulgate such rules, regulations, and orders, not inconsistent with the provisions of this act as are necessary and proper for the administration and operation of the university and the carrying out of its purposes; n.    establish fees for room and board sufficient for the operation, maintenance, and rental of student housing and food services facilities; o.    fix and determine tuition rates and other fees to be paid by students; p.    accept from any government or governmental department, agency or other public or private body or from any other source grants or contributions of money or property which the board may use for or in aid of any of its purposes; q.    acquire, by gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, own, lease, dispose of, use and operate property, whether real, personal or mixed, or any interest therein, which is necessary or desirable for university purposes; r.     employ architects to plan buildings; secure bids for the construction of buildings and for the equipment thereof; make contracts for the construction of buildings and for equipment; and supervise the construction of buildings; s.     manage and maintain, and provide for the payment of all charges on and expenses in respect of, all properties utilized by the university; t.     borrow money and to secure the same by a mortgage on its property or any part thereof, and to enter into any credit agreement for the needs of the university, as deemed requisite by the board, in such amounts and for such time and upon such terms as may be determined by the board, provided that no such borrowing shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds, other than moneys appropriated for that purpose, of the State; u.    authorize any new program, educational department or school consistent with the programmatic mission of the institution or approved by the Secretary of Higher Education; v. (1)  adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all equipment, materials, supplies and services; however, no contract on behalf of the university shall be entered into for the purchase of services, materials, equipment and supplies, for the performance of any work, or for the hiring of equipment or vehicles, through which the workers employed in the performance of the contract are paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) where the sum to be expended exceeds $33,000 or the amount determined by the Governor as provided herein, unless the university shall first publicly advertise for bids and shall award the contract to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered. Such advertising shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any such products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the said board. (2)  adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all equipment, materials, supplies, and services; however, no contract on behalf of the university shall be entered into for the purchase of services, materials, equipment and supplies, for the performance of any work, or for the hiring of equipment or vehicles, through which the workers employed in the performance of the contract are not paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) where the sum to be expended exceeds $100,000 or the amount determined by the Governor as provided in this subsection, unless the university shall first publicly advertise for bids and shall award the contract to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered. This advertising shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the board. (3)   Commencing on July 1 next following the effective date of this act, and every two years thereafter, the Governor, in consultation with the Department of the Treasury, shall adjust the threshold [amount] amounts set forth in this subsection in direct proportion to the rise or fall of the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the New York City and the Philadelphia areas as reported by the United States Department of Labor. The Governor shall notify the university of the adjustment. The adjustment shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which it is reported. (4) This subsection shall not prevent the university from having any work performed by its own employees, nor shall it apply to repairs, or to the furnishing of materials, supplies or labor, or the hiring of equipment or vehicles, when the safety or protection of its or other public property or the public convenience requires or the exigency of the university's service will not admit of such advertisement.  In such case, the university shall, by resolution passed by the affirmative vote of its board of trustees, declare the exigency or emergency to exist, and set forth in the resolution the nature and approximate amount to be expended; shall maintain appropriate records as to the reason for such awards; and shall report regularly to its board of trustees on all such purchases, the amounts and the reasons therefor; w.   invest certain moneys in such obligations, securities and other investments as the board shall deem prudent, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this act and in accordance with State and federal law, as follows: (1)   investment in not-for-profit corporations or for-profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to the provisions of subsection x. of this section may utilize income realized from the sale or licensing of intellectual property as well as the reinvestment of earnings on intellectual property; and (2)   investment in not-for-profit corporations may also utilize income from overhead grant fund recovery as permitted by federal law as well as other university funds except those specified in paragraph (5) of subsection x. of this section; x. (1) participate as the general partner or as a limited partner, either directly or through a subsidiary corporation created by the university, in limited partnerships, general partnerships, or joint ventures engaged in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, scientific information or services and create or form for-profit or not-for-profit corporations to engage in such activities; provided that any such participation shall be consistent with the mission of the university and the board shall have determined that such participation is prudent; (2)   the decision to participate in any activity described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, including the creation or formation of for-profit or not-for-profit corporations, shall be articulated in the minutes of the board of trustees meeting in which the action was approved; (3)   the provisions of P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.) shall continue to apply to the university, its employees, and officers; (4)   nothing herein shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds of the State; (5)   funds directly appropriated to the university from the State or derived from the university's academic programs shall not be utilized by the for-profit or not-for-profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to this subsection in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology or scientific information; (6)   employees of any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed public employees; (7)   a joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership, or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed an instrumentality of the State of New Jersey; (8)   income realized by the university as a result of participation in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, or scientific information may be invested or reinvested pursuant to subsection w. of this section, or any other provision of this act or State or federal law, or retained by the board for use in furtherance of any of the purposes of this act or of other applicable statutes; (9)   the board shall annually report to the State Treasurer on the operation of all joint ventures, subsidiary corporations, partnerships, or such other jural entities entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university; y.    sue and be sued in its own name; z.     retain independent counsel including representation by the Attorney General in accordance with subsection h. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6); aa. (1) procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance and indemnify against loss or damage to property from any cause, including loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employees' liability, against any act of any member, officer, employee or servant of the university, whether part-time, full-time, compensated or non-compensated in the performance of the duties of his office or employment or any other insurable risk.  In addition, the university shall carry its own liability insurance or maintain an actuarially sound program of self insurance. Any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, or partnership or such other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall carry insurance or maintain reserves in such amounts as are determined by an actuary to be sufficient to meet its actual or accrued claims; (2)   moneys in the fund known as the Self-Insurance Trust Fund administered by the State Treasurer shall continue to be available to the university solely to indemnify and defend claims against the university and its employees, officers and servants but only to the extent that the university has elected on behalf of itself and its employees to obtain representation from the Attorney General pursuant to subsection h. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6) and such entity or individuals would have been entitled to defense and indemnification pursuant to the "New Jersey Tort Claims Act," N.J.S.59:1-1 et seq., as a State entity or State employee but for the provision of subsection z. of this section. Any expenditure of such funds shall be made only in accordance with the provisions of the "New Jersey Tort Claims Act," N.J.S.59:1-1 et seq., including but not limited to the provisions of chapters 10, 10A, and 11 of Title 59 of the New Jersey Statutes.  Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize the use of the Self-Insurance Trust Fund to indemnify or insure in any way, directly or indirectly the activities of any joint venture, partnership or corporation entered into or created by the university pursuant to subsection x. of this section; bb.  create auxiliary organizations subject to the provisions of P.L.1982, c.16 (C.18A:64-26 et seq.); cc.   adopt a code of ethics that complies with the requirements of all statutes applicable to the institution, including, but not limited, to the "Higher Education Restructuring Act of 1994," P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-1 et seq.), the "New Jersey Conflicts of Interest Law," P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.), regulations of the State Ethics Commission, and any applicable executive orders; and dd.  establish a procedure for the confidential, anonymous submission of employee concerns regarding alleged wrongdoing at the university. (cf: P.L.2021, c.282, s.9) 4.    Section 7 of P.L.1995, c.400 (C.18A:64E-18) is amended to read as follows: 7.    The board of trustees of the university shall have general supervision over and be vested with the conduct, control, management and administration of the university.  It shall have the authority and responsibility to: a.     Adopt, use, and modify, as it deems appropriate, its corporate seal; b.    Determine the policies for the organization, administration and development of the university; c.     Approve the establishment of new educational programs and the discontinuance of existing educational programs at the university consistent with the university's programmatic mission as authorized by the State Board of Higher Education prior to July 1, 1994, or authorized thereafter in accordance with the provisions of the "Higher Education Restructuring Act of 1994," P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-1 et seq.); d.    Study the educational and financial needs of the university, annually acquaint the Governor and Legislature with the condition of the university, and prepare and submit an annual request for appropriation to the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury in accordance with law; e.     Disburse all moneys appropriated to the university by the Legislature and thereafter provided the university and disburse all moneys received from tuition, fees, auxiliary services and other sources; f.     Direct and control expenditures and transfers of funds appropriated and provided by the State through its legislative and executive branches and as to funds received from other sources, direct and control expenditures and transfers in accordance with the terms of any applicable trusts, gifts, bequests, or other special provisions.  The university shall annually report changes and additions thereto and transfers thereof to the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  All accounts of the university shall be subject to audit by the State at any time; g.    Appoint and fix the compensation and term of office of a president of the university, who, as the executive officer of the university, shall be assigned that authority and delegated those duties that the board, consistent with law and duly adopted bylaws of the board, determines are in keeping with the purposes of this act and in the best interests of the university; h.    Consistent with the provisions of its budget, this act and any and all controlling collective bargaining agreements, have the power, upon nomination or recommendation of the president, to appoint, remove, promote and transfer all other officers, agents, or employees which may be required to carry out the provisions of this act and prescribe qualifications for those positions, and assign requisite duties and determine and fix respective compensation for those positions in accordance with duly adopted salary program parameters; i.     Subject to provision for impartial binding dispute resolution through collective bargaining or as provided by university policy and further subject to and limited by any law to the contrary, have final authority to determine controversies and disputes concerning tenure, personnel matters and other issues involving the university arising under Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes.  Any hearings conducted by the board pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.).  The final administrative decision of the board, in any action enabled hereunder, is appealable to the Superior Court, Appellate Division; j.     Borrow money for the needs of the university, as deemed requisite by the board, in such amounts, for such time and upon such terms as may be determined by the board; provided that no such borrowing shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit, or be payable out of property or funds, other than moneys appropriated for that purpose, of the State; k.    Purchase, lease, acquire by gifts, condemnation or otherwise, manage, use, control, encumber and dispose of property, or any interest therein, whether real, personal or mixed, including, but not limited to, all buildings and grounds, as necessary or deemed desirable for university purposes. (1)   Employ architects and engineers to plan buildings and other campus facilities; secure bids for the construction of buildings and for the equipment thereof; make contracts for the construction of buildings and for the equipment thereof; and supervise that construction; (2)   Accept from any government or governmental department, agency or other public or private body or from any other source grants or contributions of money or property which the board may use for or in aid of any of its purposes; (3)   Adopt standing operating rules and procedures for the purchase of all properties, whether real, personal or mixed and including all equipment, materials and supplies and for the purchase of all services. These rules and procedures shall include public competitive bidding, where the sum to be expended exceeds: (a) [$17,700] $29,100 for contracts through which workers employed in the performance of the contract are paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.); (b)   $100,000 for contracts through which workers employed in the performance of the contract are not paid in accordance with the New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act, P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.); or (c)   the amount determined by the Governor as provided [herein and the awarding of] in this subsection. The contracts shall be awarded to that responsible bidder whose bid, conforming to the invitation for bids, will be most advantageous to the university, price and other factors considered. This public bidding process shall not be required in those exceptions created by the board of trustees of the university, which shall be in substance those exceptions contained in sections 4 and 5 of P.L.1954, c.48 (C.52:34-9 and C.52:34-10) and section 5 of P.L.1986, c.43 (C.18A:64-56) or for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service provided by a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of this State and tariffs and schedules of the charges made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any products to be supplied or services to be rendered are filed with the board. Neither shall public bidding be required for the supplying of any product or the rendering of any service by a public utility, subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Public Utilities of the State and tariffs and schedules of the charges, made, charged, or exacted by the public utility for any products to be supplied or services to be rendered as are filed with that board.  Commencing January 1, 1997 and every two years thereafter, the Governor, in consultation with the Department of the Treasury, shall adjust the threshold [amount] amounts set forth in this [paragraph] subsection in direct proportion to the rise or fall of the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the New York City and the Philadelphia areas as reported by the United States Department of Labor.  The Governor shall notify the university of the adjustment.  The adjustment shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which it is reported. This subsection shall not prevent the university from having any work done by its own employees, nor shall it apply to repairs, or to the furnishing of materials, supplies or labor or the hiring of equipment or vehicles, when the safety or protection of its or other public property or the public convenience requires or the exigency of the university's service will not admit of such advertisement.  In such case, the university shall ,by resolution passed by an affirmative vote of its board of trustees, declare the exigency or emergency to exist, remediate as practicable and maintain appropriate records as to the reason for such awards, reporting as soon as practicable thereafter to its board of trustees on all such purchases, the amounts and the reasons therefor; (4)   Manage and maintain, and provide for the payment of all charges on and expenses in respect of, all properties utilized by the university; (5)   Invest certain moneys in such obligations, securities and other investments as the board shall deem prudent consistent with the purpose and provisions of this act and in accordance with State and federal law, as follows: Investment in not for profit corporations or for profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to the provisions of subsection s. of this section may utilize income realized from the sale or licensing of intellectual property as well as the reinvestment of earnings on intellectual property.  Investment in not for profit corporations may also utilize income from overhead grant fund recovery as permitted by federal law as well as other university funds except those specified in paragraph 4 of subsection s. of this section; (6)   Exercise the right of eminent domain, pursuant to the provisions of the "Eminent Domain Act of 1971," P.L.1971, c.361 (C.20:3-1 et seq.), to acquire any property or interest therein; l.     Fix and determine tuition rates, and other fees to be paid by students, after reasonable notice and public hearing pursuant to the provisions of the "Higher Education Restructuring Act of 1994," P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-1 et seq.); m.   Grant diplomas, certificates or degrees; n.    Enter into contracts and agreements with the State or any of its political subdivisions or with the United States, or with any public body, department or other agency of the State or the United States or with any individual, firm or corporation which are deemed necessary or advisable by the board for carrying out the provisions of this act.  A contract or agreement pursuant to this subsection may require a municipality to undertake obligations and duties to be performed subsequent to the expiration of the term of office of the elected governing body of the municipality which initially entered into or approved the contract or agreement, and the obligations and duties so incurred by the municipality shall be binding and of full force and effect, notwithstanding that the term of office of the elected members of the governing body of the municipality which initially entered into or approved that contract or agreement, shall have expired. Pursuant to this subsection, the board of trustees may procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance and indemnify against loss or damage to property from any cause, including loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employees' liability, against any act of any member, officer, employee or servant of the university, whether part-time, full-time, compensated or non-compensated in the performance of the duties of his office or employment or any other insurable risk.  In addition, the university shall carry its own liability insurance or maintain an actuarially sound program of self-insurance.  Any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, or partnership or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall maintain insurance or reserves in such amounts as are determined by an actuary to be sufficient to meet its actual or accrued claims; o.    Adopt bylaws and amend the same as deemed necessary from time to time and make, promulgate and modify at its pleasure such rules, regulations and orders, not inconsistent with the provisions of this act, as are deemed necessary and proper for the administration and operation of the university and to implement the provisions of this act; p.    Develop an institutional plan and determine the schools, departments, programs and degree levels to be offered by the university consistent with that plan and the university's programmatic mission as authorized by the State Board of Higher Education prior to July 1, 1994, or authorized thereafter in accordance with the provisions of the "Higher Education Restructuring Act of 1994," P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A: 3B-1 et seq.); q.    Function as a public employer under the "New Jersey Employer-Employee Relations Act," P.L.1941, c.100 (C.34:13A-1 et seq.), appointing its chief spokesperson and continuing to conduct all labor negotiations with the participation of the Governor's Office of Employee Relations; r.     Continue to retain independent counsel; s.     Participate as the general partner or as a limited partner, either directly or through a subsidiary corporation created by the university, in limited partnerships, general partnerships, or joint ventures engaged in the development, manufacture, or marketing of products, technology, scientific information or services and create or form for profit or not for profit corporations to engage in such activities; provided that any such participation shall be consistent with the mission of the university and the board shall have determined that such participation is prudent. (1)   The decision to participate in any of the activities described in this subsection, including the creation or formation of for profit or not for profit corporations, shall be articulated in the minutes of the board of trustees meeting in which action was approved.  A true copy of the minutes of that meeting shall be delivered to the Governor.  No such action shall take effect until 30 days, Saturdays, Sundays and public holidays excepted, after the copy of the minutes shall have been delivered to the Governor.  If, within the 30-day period, the Governor returns the minutes of the meeting with a veto of the action taken by the board, the action taken by the board shall be null and void and of no effect. (2)   Any actions taken by the university pursuant to this subsection shall be in conformity with the university's policy on conflicts of interest and the provisions of P.L.1971, c.182 (C.52:13D-12 et seq.), which shall apply to the university, its employees and officers. (3)   Nothing herein shall be deemed or construed to create or constitute a debt, liability, or a loan or pledge of the credit or be payable out of property or funds of the State. (4)   Funds directly appropriated to the university from the State or derived from the university's academic programs shall not be utilized by the for profit or not for profit corporations organized and operated pursuant to this subsection in the development, manufacture or marketing of products, technology or scientific information. (5)   Employees of any joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed public employees. (6)   A joint venture, subsidiary corporation, partnership or other jural entity entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university shall not be deemed an instrumentality of the State of New Jersey. (7)   Income realized by the university as a result of participation in the development, manufacture or marketing of products, technology, or scientific information may be invested, reinvested or retained by the board in accordance with the provisions of this act and any other State or federal law for use in furtherance of any of the purposes of this act or of other applicable statutes. (8)   The board shall include in its annual report to the State Treasurer, the operation of all joint ventures, subsidiary corporations, partnerships or other jural entities entered into or owned wholly or in part by the university; t.     Create, operate, or participate in the operation of such auxiliary organizations as permitted by law which the board deems prudent and which are in keeping with the educational and public service mission of the university; and u.    Sue and be sued in its own name. (cf: P.L.1995, c.400, s.7) 5.    N.J.S.18A:18A-3 is amended to read as follows: 18A:18A-3.  a.  (1) When the cost or price of [any] a contract [awarded by the purchasing agent] , in the aggregate, does not exceed in a contract year the total sum of $17,500, [the contract may be awarded by a purchasing agent when so authorized by resolution of the] a board of education may authorize a purchasing agent to award the contract without public advertising for bids and bidding therefor[, except that the] . The board of education may adopt a resolution to set a lower threshold for the receipt of public bids or the solicitation of competitive quotations. (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a contract having an anticipated value in excess of $17,500, but below the applicable public bidding threshold, is not required to be awarded by a board of education and may be awarded by a purchasing agent if the purchasing agent possesses a qualified purchasing agent certificate pursuant to subsection b. of section 9 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-9). (3) If the purchasing agent possesses a qualified purchasing agent certificate pursuant to subsection b. of section 9 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-9) the board of education may establish that the bid threshold may be up to $25,000, or the amount determined by the Governor pursuant to subsection b. of this section. [Such] The authorization may be granted for each contract or by a general delegation of the power to negotiate and award [such] the contracts pursuant to this section. b.    Commencing in the fifth year after the year in which P.L.1999, c.440 takes effect, and every five years thereafter, the Governor, in consultation with the Department of the Treasury, shall adjust the threshold amount and the higher threshold amount which the board of education is permitted to establish as set forth in subsection a. of this section or the threshold amount resulting from any adjustment under this subsection, in direct proportion to the rise [or fall] of the index rate as that term is defined in N.J.S.18A:18A-2, and shall round the adjustment to the nearest $1,000.  The Governor shall notify all local school districts of the adjustment no later than June 1 of every fifth year. The adjustment shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which it is made. Any contract made pursuant to this section may be awarded for a period of up to 24 consecutive months, except that contracts for professional services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of N.J.S.18A:18A-5 may be awarded for a period not exceeding 12 consecutive months. (cf: P.L.2009, c.166, s.6) 6.    Section 3 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-3) is amended to read as follows: 3. a. (1) When the cost or price of [any] a contract [awarded by the contracting agent] , in the aggregate, does not exceed in a contract year the total sum of $17,500, the [contract may be awarded by a purchasing agent or other employee so designated by the] governing body [when so authorized], by ordinance or resolution, as appropriate to the contracting unit, may authorize a purchasing agent or other designated employee to award the contract without public advertising for bids[, except that the governing body of]. (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a contract having an anticipated value in excess of $17,500, but below the contracting units applicable public bidding threshold, is not required to be awarded by the governing body of the contracting unit and may be awarded by the qualified purchasing agent of the contracting unit. (3) The governing body of a contracting unit that has designated a purchasing agent pursuant to subsection a. of section 9 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-9) may establish a bid threshold of up to  $25,000 or the threshold amount adjusted by the Governor pursuant to subsection c. of this section. (4) The governing body of any contracting unit may adopt an ordinance or resolution to set a lower threshold for the receipt of public bids or the solicitation of competitive quotations. [If a purchasing agent has been appointed, the governing body of the contracting unit may establish that the bid threshold may be up to $25,000 or the threshold amount adjusted by the Governor pursuant to subsection c. of this section. Such authorization] (5) Bidding thresholds established by the governing body of a contracting unit pursuant to paragraphs (2) or (3) of this subsection may be granted for each contract or by a general delegation of the power to negotiate and award [such] the contracts pursuant to this section. b.    Any contract made pursuant to this section may be awarded for a period of up to 24 consecutive months, except that contracts for professional services pursuant to subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 5 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-5) may be awarded for a period not exceeding 12 consecutive months.  The Division of Local Government Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning the methods of accounting for all contracts that do not coincide with the contracting unit's fiscal year. c.     The Governor, in consultation with the Department of the Treasury, shall, no later than March 1 of every fifth year beginning in the fifth year after the year in which P.L.1999, c.440 takes effect, adjust the threshold amount, in direct proportion to the rise [or fall] of the index rate as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-2), and shall round the adjustment to the nearest $1,000.  The Governor shall, no later than June 1 of every fifth year, notify each governing body of the adjustment.  The adjustment shall become effective on July 1 of the year in which it is made. (cf: P.L.2009, c.166, s.2) 7.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the first month next following enactment.